Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1353.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 310(d) of the act of December 22, 1983 (P.L.306, No.84), known as the Board of Vehicles Act, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:SECTION 1. THE DEFINITION OF "RELEVANT MARKET AREA" IN SECTION 102 OF THE ACT OF DECEMBER 22, 1983 (P.L.306, NO.84), KNOWN AS THE BOARD OF VEHICLES ACT, IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 102. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS ACT SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:* * *<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021 "RELEVANT MARKET AREA." THE AREA WITHIN A RADIUS OF 20 MILES AROUND AN EXISTING DEALER OR THE AREA OF RESPONSIBILITY DEFINED IN THE FRANCHISE, WHICHEVER IS GREATER; EXCEPT:(1) WHERE A MANUFACTURER IS SEEKING TO ESTABLISH AN ADDITIONAL NEW VEHICLE DEALER, THE RELEVANT MARKET AREA SHALL BE IN ALL INSTANCES THE AREA WITHIN A RADIUS OF TEN MILES AROUND THE PROPOSED SITE OF THE ADDITIONAL NEW VEHICLE DEALER, EXCEPT FOR CITIES OF THE FIRST AND SECOND CLASS WHICH WILL BE THE AREA WITHIN A FIVE-MILE RADIUS, AROUND THE PROPOSED SITE OF THE ADDITIONAL NEW VEHICLE DEALER; AND(2) WHERE A MANUFACTURER IS SEEKING TO RELOCATE AN EXISTING DEALER, THE RELEVANT MARKET AREA IS THE AREA WITHIN A RADIUS OF 20 MILES AROUND THE PROPOSED SITE OF THE RELOCATING DEALER OR THE AREA OF RESPONSIBILITY DEFINED IN THE FRANCHISE OF THE RELOCATING DEALER, WHICHEVER IS GREATER.THIS DEFINITION SHALL NOT APPLY TO MANUFACTURED HOUSING [OR] DEALERS, RECREATIONAL VEHICLE DEALERS OR DEALERS OF TRAILERS, OR THEIR MANUFACTURER AGREEMENTS.* * *SECTION 2. SECTION 310(D) OF THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH TO READ:Section 310. Unlawful acts by manufacturers or distributors.* * *(d) Applicability.--* * *(1.2) This section shall not apply to manufacturers, distributors or dealers of trailers.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.SECTION 3. SECTION 311(B) AND 326(B)(4) OF THE ACT ARE 20260SB1353PN1762 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 311. AREA OF RESPONSIBILITY.* * *(B) EXCEPTION.--THIS SECTION SHALL NOT APPLY TO RECREATIONAL VEHICLE MANUFACTURERS, DISTRIBUTORS OR DEALERS OR TO MANUFACTURERS, DISTRIBUTORS OR DEALERS OF TRAILERS.SECTION 326. LIMITATIONS ON ESTABLISHING OR RELOCATING DEALERS.* * *(B) NONAPPLICABILITY OF SECTION.--THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY:* * *(4) TO MANUFACTURED HOUSING [OR] DEALERS, RECREATIONAL VEHICLE DEALERS OR DEALERS OF TRAILERS.* * *SECTION 4. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.20260SB1353PN1762 - 3 - 123456789101112131415